Utah statutes.
70A-2-318.   Third-party beneficiaries of warranties express or implied.
A seller's warranty whether express or implied extends to any person who may
reasonably be expected to use, consume or be affected by the goods and who is
injured by breach of the warranty. A seller may not exclude or limit the
operation of this section with respect to injury to the person of an
individual to whom the warranty extends.
